New Jersey, session 222, S1963.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Each vehicle used to transport enrolled children to and from a child care center licensed pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1983, c.492 (C.30:5B-1 et seq.), except private passenger vehicles, shall be equipped with an alarm system, approved by the Department of Children and Families pursuant to subsection b. of section 2 of this act, that prompts the driver to inspect the vehicle for children before exiting the vehicle. 2.    The Department of Children and Families, in consultation with the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission, shall: a.     adopt, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations concerning the alarm system required to be installed in each vehicle that transports enrolled children to and from a licensed child care center, which shall include minimum safety standards; and b.    approve alarm systems that meet the minimum safety standards adopted pursuant to subsection a. of this section. 3.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the sixth month after enactment.